Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.290

Prohibition defined.

The writ of prohibition is the counterpart of the writ of mandate. It arrests the proceedings of any tribunal, corporation, board or person, when such proceedings are without or in excess of the jurisdiction of such tribunal, corporation, board or person.

[ 1895 c 65 s 29; RRS s 1027.]